Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 3

Prohibited Acts

57-5-301. Sales to minors or intoxicated persons prohibited — Employment of certain offenders prohibited — Hours of sale and consumption — Loitering by minors — Possession by minors unlawful — Signs on vendors' premises.

A permit holder engaging in the business regulated hereunder or any employee thereof shall not make or permit to be made any sales to minors or persons visibly intoxicated. Prior to making a sale of beer for off-premise consumption, the adult consumer must present to the permit holder, or any employee of the permit holder, a valid, government-issued document, such as a driver’s license, or other form of identification deemed acceptable to the permit holder, that includes the photograph and birth date of the adult consumer attempting to make a beer purchase. Persons exempt under state law from the requirement of having a photo identification shall present identification that is acceptable to the permit holder. The permit holder or employee shall make a determination from the information presented whether the purchaser is an adult. In addition to the prohibition of making a sale to a minor, no sale of beer for off-premises consumption shall be made to a person who does not present such a document or other form of identification to the permit holder or any employee of the permit holder; however, it is an exception to any criminal punishment or adverse administrative action, including license suspension or revocation, as provided for a violation of this section if the sale was made to a person who is or reasonably appears to be over fifty (50) years of age and who failed to present an acceptable form of identification. Responsible vendors shall post signs on the vendor’s premises informing customers of the vendor’s policy against selling beer to underage persons. The signs shall be not less than eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8½" x 11"), and contain the following language: STATE LAW REQUIRES IDENTIFICATION FOR THE SALE OF BEER. Neither the person engaging in such business nor persons employed by that person shall be a person who has been convicted of any violation of the laws against possession, sale, manufacture and transportation of intoxicating liquor or any crime involving moral turpitude within the last ten (10) years.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.

No alcoholic beverage within the scope hereof shall be sold between twelve o’clock midnight (12:00) and six o'clock a.m. (6:00 a.m.). No such beverage shall be sold between twelve o’clock midnight (12:00) on Saturday and eleven fifty-nine o'clock p.m. (11:59 p.m.) on Sunday. No such beverage shall be consumed, or opened for consumption, on or about any premises licensed hereunder, in either bottle, glass, or other container, after twelve fifteen o'clock a.m. (12:15 a.m.). Any county by resolution of the governing body may extend the hours for the sale of beer; provided, however, that the hours for the sale of beer in “clubs” as defined in § 57-4-102, shall conform to those hours for the sale of liquor by the drink as provided in chapter 4 of this title.

A violation of subdivision (b)(1) is a Class C misdemeanor.

This subsection (b) shall not affect the power of governing bodies of municipal corporations or of Class B counties by ordinance to fix the hours when such beverages may be sold within the incorporated limits of such respective municipalities or within the general services districts of Class B counties outside the limits of any smaller city as defined in § 7-1-101. Municipal corporations may authorize the sale of such beverages in their respective corporate limits on Sundays or at such hours as may be prescribed by ordinance. Class B counties may authorize the sale of such beverages on Sundays in their respective general services districts outside their urban services districts and outside the limits of any smaller city or cities or in their respective urban services districts or in both or at such hours as may be prescribed by ordinance.

The governing body of any county that has adopted liquor by the drink, as provided for in chapter 4 of this title, may fix the hours for the sale of beer within the county (that part of the county outside of incorporated municipalities). This subdivision (b)(4) shall not affect business establishments selling liquor by the drink and malt beverages as authorized by chapter 4 of this title.

In any county in which an incorporated municipality has authorized the sale of liquor by the drink, as provided for in chapter 4 of this title, the hours for the sale of beer as defined in § 57-6-102, in that part of the county outside of incorporated municipalities and in all of its municipalities which have authorized the sale of liquor by the drink, shall be the same as the hours authorized by the rules and regulations promulgated by the alcoholic beverage commission for establishments selling liquor by the drink; provided, however, that the county legislative body of any such county and the governing body of each municipality within the county which has authorized the sale of liquor by the drink shall have the authority to extend the hours for the sale of beer as defined in § 57-6-102, within the territorial jurisdiction of each governing body. This subdivision (b)(5)(A) shall not apply to counties and municipalities that have legalized the sale of liquor by the drink by a county-wide referendum.

In any jurisdiction that has elected Tennessee River resort district status pursuant to § 67-6-103(a)(3)(F) and is considered a Tennessee River resort district for purposes of chapter 4, part 1 of this title, the hours for the sale of beer within the boundaries of any such resort district shall not be less than the hours authorized for establishments selling liquor or wine for on-premises consumption.

It is unlawful for the management of any place where any beverage licensed hereunder is sold to allow any minor to loiter about such place of business, and the burden of ascertaining the age of minor customers shall be upon the owner or operator of such place of business.

It is unlawful and punishable as provided in § 57-5-303, for any minor to purchase or attempt to purchase any such beverage.

In addition to any criminal penalty established in this section, a court in which a person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older is convicted of the purchase or attempt to purchase or possession of beer in violation of this section shall prepare and send to the department of safety, driver control division, within five (5) working days of the conviction an order of denial of driving privileges for the offender.

The court and the department of safety shall follow the same procedures and utilize the same sanctions and costs for an offender younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older as provided in title 55, chapter 10, part 7, for offenders younger than eighteen (18) years of age but thirteen (13) years of age or older.

Any person who purchases any such beverage for or on behalf of a person under twenty-one (21) years of age commits a Class A misdemeanor and, in addition to the punishment authorized by § 40-35-111, shall be punished pursuant to § 39-15-404.

Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age who knowingly makes a false statement or exhibits false identification to the effect that the person is twenty-one (21) years of age or older to any person engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages licensed hereunder for the purpose of purchasing or obtaining the same is guilty of a misdemeanor. In addition to any criminal penalty established by this subdivision (d)(3), a court in which a person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older is convicted under this subdivision (d)(3) of a second or subsequent offense shall prepare and send to the department of safety, driver control division, within five (5) working days of the conviction, an order of denial of driving privileges for the offender for a period not to exceed one (1) year. The offender may apply to the court for a restricted driver license. The judge shall order the issuance of a restricted motor vehicle operator's license, in accordance with § 55-50-502. The court and the department shall follow the same procedures and utilize the same costs for a person younger than twenty-one (21) years of age but eighteen (18) years of age or older as provided in title 55, chapter 10, part 7, for offenders younger than eighteen (18) years of age but thirteen (13) years of age or older.

If the person violating this subdivision (d)(3) is less than eighteen (18) years of age, the person shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty ($50.00) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not less than twenty (20) hours of community service work, which fine or penalty shall not be suspended or waived. The fine imposed by this subdivision (d)(3)(A) shall apply regardless of whether the violator cooperates with law enforcement officers by telling them the place the alcohol was purchased or obtained or from whom it was purchased or obtained.

If the person violating this subdivision (d)(3) is eighteen (18) years of age or older but less than twenty-one (21) years of age, the person shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the local jail or workhouse for not less than five (5) days nor more than thirty (30) days. The penalties imposed by this subdivision (d)(3)(B) shall apply regardless of whether the violator cooperates with law enforcement officers by telling them the place the alcohol was purchased or obtained or from whom it was purchased or obtained.

It is unlawful for any person under twenty-one (21) years of age to have in the person's possession beer for any purpose, and it is unlawful for any such minor to transport beer for any purpose except the same be in the course of employment.

A violation of subdivision (e)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age found to have violated subdivision (e)(1) shall, regardless of the final disposition of such violation, have the right to have the records, as defined in § 40-32-101, of such violation destroyed after the passage of six (6) months from the date of the violation. Such destruction shall occur upon motion of the person to the court which heard the violation and shall be without cost to such person.

Vendors shall post signs on the vendor's premises informing customers of the vendor's policy against selling beer to underage persons. The signs shall be not less than eight and one-half inches by five and one-half inches (8½" x 5½"), and shall contain the following language: IF YOU AREN'T 21 AND ARE IN POSSESSION OF BEER, YOU COULD LOSE YOUR DRIVER LICENSE.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 9a; 1935, ch. 170, § 3; 1943, ch. 53, §§ 2, 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.10; Acts 1961, ch. 170, § 1; 1963, ch. 222, § 1; 1965, ch. 321, § 5; 1970, ch. 353, § 1; 1972, ch. 555, § 1; 1978, ch. 537, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 413, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-221; Acts 1982, ch. 877, § 4; 1984, ch. 1006, §§ 4, 10, 18; 1985, ch. 321, §§ 2, 3; 1985, ch. 375, § 5; 1986, ch. 758, § 1; 1986, ch. 788, § 3; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 111, 113; 1991, ch. 473, § 4; 1996, ch. 641, § 5; 1997, ch. 423, §§ 1-3; 1998, ch. 780, § 1; 2006, ch. 864, § 12; 2006, ch. 900, § 2; 2006, ch. 986, §§ 3, 4, 6; 2008, ch. 877, §§ 1, 3; 2009, ch. 208, § 2; 2011, ch. 27, §§ 2, 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Portions of this section have been rewritten by the executive secretary to the Tennessee code commission to implement Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111, effective November 1, 1989, which requested that the executive secretary amend this section by deleting the penalty provision and inserting language to indicate violation of the section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor penalty provisions in subsections (c) and (d) may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§39-11-114,40-35-110,40-35-111.

For similar provisions relative to purchases and possession by minors, see §57-4-203 and accompanying notes.

Acts 2006, ch. 864, § 12, provided that the amendment by the act, which added the second through sixth sentences of subdivision (a)(1), shall sunset on July 1, 2008. Acts 2008, ch 877 § 1 provided that Acts 2006, ch. 864, § 12 is amended by deleting the last sentence in § 12 in its entirety which reads: “The provisions of this section will sunset July 1, 2008.”

Cross-References. Alcohol-related injuries, title 57, ch. 10.

Eighteen-year-olds, legal responsibility, alcoholic beverage restrictions on persons under 21, §1-3-113.

False representations by minors, §§57-3-412,57-4-203.

Juvenile alcohol abuse, title 33, ch. 10, part 3.

“Minor” defined, §1-3-105.

Penalties for Class A and Class C misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

Tennessee Responsible Vendor Act of 2006, title 57, ch. 5, part 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 4, 5, 9, 12, 21.

Law Reviews.

One Too Many: Sellers, Servers Must Know “How Much Is Too Much” to Avoid Alcohol Related Injuries (Mike Faulk), 43 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2007).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Destruction of records—juvenile court—alcohol violations by a minor, OAG 92-68 (12/28/92).

Purchasing beverages of 5% alcohol or less for person under 21, OAG 94-051 (4/6/94).

No driver's license suspension for underage consumers of alcohol, OAG 94-137 (11/21/94).

Conviction of driving under the influence not bar to employment, OAG 95-037 (4/18/95).

Applicability of local beer permit ordinance to liquor-by-the-drink license holders, OAG 99-098 (4/30/99).

Constitutionality of subdivision (b)(5), relating to hours for sale of beer in counties containing municipalities that have adopted liquor-by-the-drink, OAG 99-187 (9/22/99).

In a county that has not approved liquor by the drink by means of a county-wide referendum, but in which several municipalities have approved liquor by the drink, the hours for the sale of beer in areas of the county outside of incorporated municipalities and within those municipalities that have adopted liquor by the drink will be those set for the sale of liquor by the drink by the alcoholic beverage commission; thus, beer sales in these areas of the county may begin as early as 10:00 a.m. on Sundays, and this starting time for beer sales is applicable to sales by stores for off-premises consumption, as well as sales for consumption on the premises, OAG 02-23 (2/27/02).

In a county that has not approved liquor by the drink by means of a county-wide referendum, but in which several municipalities have approved liquor by the drink, and in which one incorporated municipality that has approved liquor by the drink decides by resolution to “opt out” of the expanded time for Sunday liquor-by-the-drink sales in order to return to the previous starting time of 12:00 noon, the hours for the sale of beer in areas of the county outside of incorporated municipalities and within those other municipalities that have adopted liquor by the drink will be those set for the sale of liquor by the drink by the alcoholic beverage commission, and, therefore, beer sales in these areas of the county may begin as early as 10:00 a.m. on Sundays, OAG 02-23 (2/27/02).

In counties that have not approved liquor by the drink by means of a county-wide referendum, but contain at least one municipality that has approved liquor by the drink by municipal referendum, the hours for the sale of beer in areas of the county outside of incorporated municipalities, and within those municipalities that allow liquor by the drink, will be those set by the alcoholic beverage commission for the sale of liquor by the drink; however, the governing body of a county or incorporated municipality may extend the hours for beer sales beyond these times in their respective jurisdictions, OAG 02-033 (3/15/02).

Violations by minors, OAG 07-104 (7/12/07).

Revocation and suspension of beer permits, OAG 07-104 (7/12/07).

Hours for the sale of beer in a municipality located within a Tennessee River resort district. OAG 10-92, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 98 (8/17/10).

57-5-302. [Reserved.]

Any violation of this chapter or rule or regulation of the commissioner of revenue or the violations of any rule or regulation of a county legislative body, metropolitan council or city legislative body relative to the conducting of the beer or like beverage business as defined in § 57-5-101 is a Class C misdemeanor where the penalty is not otherwise fixed.

A violation of this section involving either unlawful possession or illegal transportation, or both, of over one hundred (100) cases of twenty-four (24) twelve ounce (12 oz.) cans of beer or other light alcoholic beverage, or the equivalent thereof with respect to quantity or the kinds of containers, is a Class E felony.

Upon the second conviction of any person engaging in a business regulated under this chapter of making, or permitting to be made, any sale of alcoholic beverages, beer or wine to a person under twenty-one (21) years of age in violation of this chapter, such person is guilty of a Class E felony. In addition, upon the second such conviction, the permit or license of such person shall be automatically and permanently revoked regardless of any other punishment actually imposed.

Each violation of this chapter shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.16 (Williams, § 1191.17); Acts 1965, ch. 321, § 6; 1969, ch. 299, § 2; 1972, ch. 448, § 3; 1979, ch. 256, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 413, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-223; Acts 1984, ch. 1006, § 5; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 64, 65.

Cross-References. Age of majority for purposes of purchasing, consuming, transporting alcoholic beverages, §§1-3-105,1-3-113.

Eighteen-year-olds, legal responsibility, alcoholic beverage restrictions on persons under 21, §1-3-113.

Juvenile alcohol abuse, title 33, ch. 10, part 3.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Purchase of beverages from unauthorized seller, penalty, §57-5-406.

Transportation of beer and light alcoholic beverages, unlawful acts, §§57-5-406,57-5-414,57-5-416.

Attorney General Opinions. Purchasing beverages of 5% alcohol or less for person under 21, OAG 94-051 (4/6/94).

A vendor who is caught selling beer to a minor is subject to criminal penalties imposed by the local criminal court ranging from a Class A misdemeanor to a Class E felony and is also subject to the suspension or revocation of the permit imposed by the local beer board, OAG 01-062 (4/20/01).

57-5-304. Outdoor advertisement at retail beer establishments.

No outdoor sign, advertisement or display that advertises beer may be erected or maintained on the property on which a retail beer establishment is located other than one (1) sign, advertisement or display which makes reference to the fact that the establishment sells beer but does not use brand names, pictures, numbers, prices or diagrams relating to beer.

This section shall not apply to any sign, advertisement or display erected or maintained by or at the request of a temporary beer permittee or to any sports arena, stadium or entertainment complex.

Acts 1988, ch. 487, § 1; 1996, ch. 641, § 6.